test/src/morphology/V-täristä_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - täristä: # Verb 'to bring' - full paradigm
     tärisä+V+Inf: täristä
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tärisen
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: täriset
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tärissee
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tärisemä
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tärisettä
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: täristhään
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tärisin
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tärisit
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tärisi
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tärisimä
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tärisittä
     tärisä+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: täristhiin
     tärisä+V+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tärissy
